Massachusetts, session 194th, H4561.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the 
licensing authority of the town of Cohasset may grant 5 additional licenses for the sale of all 
alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 12 of said chapter 138 to 
establishments located within the 3 economic development zones described in subsection (b) 
upon approval of and under conditions set by the licensing authority of the town of Cohasset. A 
license granted under this act shall be clearly marked on its face either “Village District”, “3A 
Commercial District” or “Harbor District” as applicable, and subject to all of said chapter 138 
except said section 17. 
(b) The licensing authority shall restrict the licenses authorized in this act to 
establishments located within either the town’s: (i) “Village District”; (ii) “3A Commercial 
District”; or (iii) “Harbor District” as those areas are designated on the map entitled “Town of 
Cohasset Massachusetts Zoning District Map September 2024” as adopted by Town Meeting 

of 2 13 commencing June 5, 2024, a copy of which is on file in the office of the town clerk of the town 
of Cohasset. 
(c) A license granted pursuant to this act shall only be exercised in the dining room of a 
common victualler and other such public rooms or areas as may be deemed reasonable and 
appropriate by the licensing authority as certified in writing. 
(d) The licensing authority shall not approve the transfer of a license granted pursuant to 
this act to a location outside of its initial zoned area as described in clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) of 
subsection (b), but it may grant such license to a new applicant within such initial zoned area if 
the applicant files with the licensing authority a letter from the department of revenue and a letter 
from the department of unemployment assistance indicating that the license is in good standing 
with those departments and that all applicable taxes, fees and contributions have been paid. 
(e) If a licensee terminates or fails to renew a license granted under this act or any such 
license granted under this act is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use, the license shall be 
returned physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges and restrictions pertaining thereto, to 
the licensing authority, which may then grant the license to a new applicant under the same 
conditions specified in this act. 
(f) All licenses granted under this act shall be issued within 5 years after the effective 
date of this act; provided, however, that a license originally granted within that time period may 
be granted to a new applicant under subsections (d) and (e) thereafter. 
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.